District of Columbia statutes.
21-155

Sale or exchange of particular estate or remainder; application of income.

Where an infant is entitled to a particular estate, as for life or years, and another person is entitled to an estate in remainder or reversion or by way of executory devise in the same property, or the other person is entitled to the particular estate and the infant is entitled in remainder or reversion or executory devise, the court may decree a sale or exchange as provided by sections 21-148 to 21-153 , having reference solely to the interests of the infant, if the other person so interested consents to the sale or exchange and execute the conveyances necessary to carry it into effect. The court shall direct the annual income from the fund or property acquired by the sale or exchange to be applied according to the interests of the respective parties.

Sept. 14, 1965, 79 Stat. 743, Pub. L. 89-183, § 1
1981 Ed., § 21-155.
1973 Ed., § 21-155.